cs: Typ sudu nebo sudu: Americký dub; Sud po koňaku; Sud po bourbonu; Sud po sherry; Francouzský dub; Sud po irské whiskey; Javorové dřevo; Sud po portském; Sud po rumu; Sud po vínu; Jiné
tr: Fıçı/varil tipi: Amerikan meşesi; Konyak fıçısı; Burbon fıçısı; Şeri fıçısı; Fransız meşesi; İrlanda viskisi fıçısı; Akçaağaç; Porto fıçısı; Rom fıçısı; Şarap fıçısı; Diğer
nl: Vat- of fusttype: Amerikaans eiken; Cognacvat; Ex-bourbonvat; Ex-sherryvat; Frans eiken; Iers whiskeyvat; Esdoornhout; Portvat; Rumvat; Wijnvat; Overig
ro-RO: Tip de putină sau butoi: Stejar american; Butoi de coniac; Fost butoi de bourbon; Fost butoi de sherry; Stejar francez; Butoi de whiskey irlandez; Lemn de arțar; Butoi de vin de Porto; Butoi de rom; Butoi de vin; Altele
ru: Тип бочки: Американский дуб; Бочка из-под коньяка; Бочка из-под бурбона; Бочка из-под хереса; Французский дуб; Бочка из-под ирландского виски; Клен; Бочка из-под портвейна; Бочка из-под рома; Бочка из-под вина; Другое
sl-SI: Vrsta soda ali sodčka: Ameriški hrast; Sod za konjak; Nekdanji sod za burbon; Nekdanji sod za šeri; Francoski hrast; Sod za irski viski; Javorjev les; Sod za portovec; Sod za rum; Sod za vino; Drugo
zh-CN: 酒桶或木桶类型: 美国橡木; 干邑酒桶; 前波本桶; 前雪莉桶; 法国橡木; 爱尔兰威士忌酒桶; 枫木; 波特酒桶; 朗姆酒桶; 葡萄酒桶; 其他
lt-LT: Statinės arba konteinerio tipas: Amerikietiškas ąžuolas; Konjako statinė; Burbono statinė; Chereso statinė; Prancūziškas ąžuolas; Airiško viskio statinė; Klevo mediena; Portveino statinė; Romo statinė; Vyno statinė; Kita
fr: Type de fût ou de tonneau: Chêne américain; Fût de cognac; Ex-fût de bourbon; Ex-fût de xérès; Chêne français; Fût de whiskey irlandais; Bois d’érable; Fût de porto; Fût de rhum; Fût de vin; Autre
ko: 배럴 또는 캐스크 유형: 아메리칸 오크; 코냑 캐스크; 엑스 버번 배럴; 엑스 셰리 캐스크; 프렌치 오크; 아이리시 위스키 캐스크; 단풍나무; 포트 캐스크; 럼 배럴; 와인 캐스크; 기타
zh-TW: 桶或木桶類型: 美國橡木; 干邑白蘭地桶; 波本桶; 雪莉桶; 法國橡木; 愛爾蘭威士忌桶; 楓木; 波特桶; 蘭姆酒桶; 葡萄酒桶; 其他
ja: 樽またはカスクタイプ: アメリカンオーク; コニャックカスク; Exバーボンバレル; Exシェリーカスク; フレンチオーク; アイリッシュウイスキーカスク; メープルウッド; ポートカスク; ラムバレル; ワインカスク; その他
de: Fasstyp: Amerikanische Eiche; Cognac-Fass; Ex-Bourbon-Fass; Ex-Sherry-Fass; Französische Eiche; Irish-Whiskey-Fass; Ahornholz; Portwein-Fass; Rum-Fass; Weinfass; Sonstige
bg-BG: Вид бъчва или буре: Американски дъб; Бъчва от коняк; Бивша бъчва от бърбън; Бивша бъчва от шери; Френски дъб; Бъчва от ирландско уиски; Кленово дърво; Бъчва от портвайн; Бъчва от ром; Бъчва от вино; Друго
pl: Typ beczki lub baryłki: Dąb amerykański; Beczka po koniaku; Beczka po bourbonie; Beczka po sherry; Dąb francuski; Beczka po irlandzkiej whiskey; Drewno klonowe; Beczka po porto; Beczka po rumie; Beczka po winie; Inna
el: Τύπος βαρελιού: Αμερικανική δρυς; Βαρέλι κονιάκ; Πρώην βαρέλι μπέρμπον; Πρώην βαρέλι σέρι; Γαλλική δρυς; Βαρέλι ιρλανδικού ουίσκι; Ξύλο σφενδάμου; Βαρέλι πόρτο; Βαρέλι ρούμι; Βαρέλι κρασιού; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de barril ou tonel: Carvalho americano; Barril de conhaque; Barril ex-bourbon; Barril ex-xerez; Carvalho francês; Barril de whiskey irlandês; Madeira de ácer; Barril de porto; Barril de rum; Barril de vinho; Outro
sk-SK: Typ valca alebo suda: Americký dub; Sud od koňaku; Sud od bourbonu; Sud od sherry; Francúzsky dub; Sud od írskej whiskey; Javorové drevo; Sud od portského; Sud od rumu; Sud od vína; Iné
it: Tipo di botte o barile: Rovere americano; Botte di cognac; Botte di ex-bourbon; Botte di ex-sherry; Rovere francese; Botte di whiskey irlandese; Legno di acero; Botte di porto; Botte di rum; Botte di vino; Altro
da: Tønde- eller fadtype: Amerikansk eg; Cognac-fad; Ex-bourbon-fad; Ex-sherry-fad; Fransk eg; Irsk whiskey-fad; Ahorntræ; Portvinsfad; Romfad; Vinfad; Andet
nb: Tønne- eller fattype: Amerikansk eik; Kognakkfat; Ex-bourbonfat; Ex-sherryfat; Fransk eik; Irsk whiskey-fat; Lønnetre; Portvinsfat; Romfat; Vinfat; Annet
en: Barrel or cask type: American oak; Cognac cask; Ex-bourbon barrel; Ex-sherry cask; French oak; Irish whiskey cask; Maple wood; Port cask; Rum barrel; Wine cask; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta bačve: Američki hrast; Bačva za konjak; Bačva od burbona; Bačva od šerija; Francuski hrast; Bačva od irskog viskija; Javorovo drvo; Bačva za porto; Bačva za rum; Bačva za vino; Ostalo
sv: Fattyp: Amerikansk ek; Konjaksfat; Före detta bourbonfat; Före detta sherryfat; Fransk ek; Irländskt whiskeyfat; Lönnträ; Portvinsfat; Romfat; Vinfat; Övrigt
vi: Loại thùng gỗ: Sồi Mỹ; Thùng ủ Cognac; Thùng từng ủ Bourbon; Thùng từng ủ Sherry; Sồi Pháp; Thùng ủ whisky Ireland; Gỗ phong; Thùng ủ rượu Port; Thùng ủ rượu Rum; Thùng ủ rượu vang; Khác
pt-BR: Tipo de barril ou tonel: Carvalho americano; Barril de conhaque; Barril de ex-bourbon; Barril de ex-jerez; Carvalho francês; Barril de uísque irlandês; Madeira de bordo; Barril de vinho do Porto; Barril de rum; Barril de vinho; Outros
hu: Hordó vagy hordó típusa: Amerikai tölgy; Konyakos hordó; Ex-bourbon hordó; Ex-sherry hordó; Francia tölgy; Ír whiskey-s hordó; Juharfa; Portóboros hordó; Rumos hordó; Boros hordó; Egyéb
fi: Tynnyrityyppi: Amerikkalainen tammi; Konjakkitynnyri; Entinen bourbon-tynnyri; Entinen sherry-tynnyri; Ranskalainen tammi; Irlantilainen viskitynnyri; Vaahterapuu; Portviinitynnyri; Rommitynnyri; Viinitynnyri; Muu
es: Tipo barril o tonel: Roble americano; Barrica de coñac; Barril ex-bourbon; Barrica ex-jerez; Roble francés; Barrica de whiskey irlandés; Madera de arce; Barrica de oporto; Barril de ron; Barrica de vino; Otro
th: ประเภทถังบ่มหรือถังไม้: อเมริกันโอ๊ก; ถังคอนยัก; ถังเบอร์เบินที่ผ่านการใช้แล้ว; ถังเชอร์รีที่ผ่านการใช้แล้ว; เฟรนช์โอ๊ก; ถังไอริชวิสกี้; ไม้เมเปิล; ถังพอร์ต; ถังรัม; ถังไวน์; อื่นๆ